Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5449.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5c. (1) A covered official of the unemployment insurance agency, for not less than 2 years after the date that the covered official's employment ends with the unemployment insurance agency, including the end of any temporary, acting, contractual, or consulting assignment, shall not do any of the following: (a) Accept employment, compensation, consulting fees, gifts, or anything of value, directly or indirectly, from a vendor that entered into a contract with the unemployment insurance agency during the time that the covered official worked in a covered official position for the unemployment insurance agency. (b) Represent, advise, or assist a vendor that holds a contract with the unemployment insurance agency in any matter before the unemployment insurance agency. (2) If a vendor employs or compensates a covered official in violation of this act, the vendor is ineligible to do any of the following for 5 years after the violation occurs: (a) Enter into a contract with the unemployment insurance agency. (b) Renew, extend, or modify a contract that the vendor holds on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (3) Subsection (2) does not impair or invalidate a contract with the unemployment insurance agency that is in effect on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Covered official" means any of the following: (i) The director or any individual acting as the head of the unemployment insurance agency. (ii) A deputy director or assistant deputy director. (iii) A senior procurement official. (iv) A contract manager. (v) An information technology project manager assigned to a vendor contract. (vi) An employee with authority to award, negotiate, modify, monitor, or oversee a vendor contract. (b) "Vendor" includes a parent company, subsidiary, subcontractor, affiliate, or successor entity of, or an entity under common ownership or control with a vendor that holds a contract with the unemployment insurance agency.